Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.030

Setting case for hearing—Notice—Time of trial.

Upon filing of a claim, the court shall set a time for hearing on the matter. The court shall issue a notice of the claim which shall be served upon the defendant to notify the defendant of the hearing date. A trial need not be held at the first hearing, if dispute resolution services are offered instead of trial, or local practice rules provide for a pretrial hearing.

[ 2019 c 251 s 2; 1997 c 352 s 1; 1984 c 258 s 60; 1981 c 330 s 3; 1980 c 162 s 11; 1963 c 123 s 2; 1919 c 187 s 3; RRS s 1777-3.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Severability—1981 c 330: See note following RCW 3.62.060.

Severability—1980 c 162: See note following RCW 3.02.010.